Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.380

Community athletics programs—Sex discrimination prohibited.

The antidiscrimination provisions of RCW 49.60.500 apply to community athletics programs and facilities operated, conducted, or administered by a metropolitan park district.

[ 2009 c 467 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declarations—2009 c 467: See note following RCW 49.60.500.